src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! # Hill Mari adjective inflection


!! This file contains a handful of lexica, each with 3 subentries. The two first ones give +Pos+Attr dn +Comp:рак, respectively, whereeas the third entry gives a *+Der/N* tag and redirects to the relevant noun lexica for case inflection


!! ## Temporary lexicon
LEXICON A-ADN_ !!≈ * **@CODE@**  = This adjective only occurs with a head word in an adnominal phrase
  # ; 

! SNM: ensure there is a space before the jspwiki markup __ when the preceding
! character (ie last of lexicon name) is also an _ char - otherwise one gets a
! jspwiki syntax error.


!! ## Ordinary lexica

LEXICON A_  !!≈ * **@CODE@** has *aä* trigger, gets +Pos, +Comp, or goes via Der/N to NMN\_OLMA. 
     +Pos+Attr:           #        ;
    +Comp:%>р%{аӓ%}к #        ;
 +Der+Der/N+N:           NMN_OLMA ; !! This should be neutral 2013-05-11

LEXICON A_OLMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** has  *back* trigger, gets +Pos, +Comp, or goes via Der/N to NMN\_OLMA.
     +Pos+Attr:      #        ;
    +Comp:%{back%}%>рак #        ;
 +Der+Der/N+N:%{back%}      NMN_OLMA ;

LEXICON A_AEZAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** has *front* trigger, gets +Pos, +Comp, or goes via Der/N to NMN_AAEZAE.
     +Pos+Attr:      #       ;
    +Comp:%{front%}%>рӓк #       ;
 +Der+Der/N+N:%{front%}      NMN_AEZAE ;

LEXICON A_MARY  !!≈ * **@CODE@** has *back* trigger, gets +Pos, +Comp, or goes via Der/N to NMN\_MARY.
     +Pos+Attr:      #        ;
    +Comp:%{back%}%>рак #        ;
 +Der+Der/N+N:%{back%}      NMN_MARY ;

LEXICON A_TYERVYE  !!≈ * **@CODE@** har *front* trigger, gets +Pos, +Comp, or goes via Der/N to NMN\_TYERVYE.
     +Pos+Attr:      #         ;
    +Comp:%{front%}%>рӓк #         ;
 +Der+Der/N+N:%{front%}      NMN_TYERVYE ;

LEXICON A_KOL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** has *back* trigger, gets +Pos, +Comp, or goes via Der/N to NMN\_KOL.
     +Pos+Attr:      #       ;
    +Comp:%{back%}%>рак #       ;
 +Der+Der/N+N:%{back%}      NMN_KOL ; !!≈ @CODE@ The +N tag is given here to curtail over generation from derived nouns

LEXICON A_MOER  !!≈ * **@CODE@** has *front* trigger, gets +Pos, +Comp, or goes via Der/N to NMN\_MOER.
     +Pos+Attr:      #       ;
    +Comp:%{front%}%>рӓк #       ;
 +Der+Der/N+N:%{front%}      NMN_MOER ; !!≈  @CODE@ The +N tag is given here to curtail over generation from derived nouns




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
